Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-526
Municipalities adjacent to district; inclusion; election; how conducted.

Such election shall be held in the same manner as elections for the original organization of a sanitary drainage district under sections 31-501 to 31-523.

Laws 1919, c. 240, § 3, p. 1001;

C.S.1922, § 1882;

C.S.1929, § 31-620;

R.S.1943, § 31-526.